Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 1 General Provisions
6-54-139. Action or proceeding to set aside the charter of municipality or to challenge the legality of the municipality's existence.

If a municipality:

Contains the minimum number of persons as actual residents of the municipality required pursuant to the general law charter under which it incorporates;

Has continuously functioned as a municipality pursuant to its charter since its incorporation; and

Has levied a municipal property tax,

then any action or proceeding in any court to set aside the charter of such municipality or to otherwise challenge the legality of the municipality's existence as a political subdivision of this state must be commenced within ten (10) years of the date the municipality was first incorporated.

This section shall apply to any municipality meeting the requirements of this section incorporated prior to or on or after June 10, 2011.

With respect to any municipality which meets the requirements of this section, whether in existence ten (10) or more years on June 10, 2011, or after June 10, 2011, the adoption of the charter, the incorporation of territory as a municipality pursuant to the general laws of this state and the election of officials of such municipality are hereby ratified and validated in all respects; and no flaw or defect or failure to comply with any requirement of incorporation shall invalidate the territory's status as an incorporated municipality or invalidate any ordinance passed by the governing body of the municipality.

Acts 2011, ch. 453, § 10.

6-54-140. Authority for municipal governments to display historic documents on public buildings and grounds.

Each city and town is authorized to display, in municipal public buildings and on municipal public grounds, replicas of historical documents, including, but not limited to, the Ten Commandments, Magna Carta, Mayflower Compact, Declaration of Independence, United States Constitution, Bill of Rights, Constitution of Tennessee, and other such historically significant documents in the form of statues, monuments, memorials, tablets, or any other display that respects the dignity and solemnity of such documents.

Acts 2012, ch. 686, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1088, § 2 purported to enact a new § 6-54-140. Section 6-54-140 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 686, § 2; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012 ch. 1088, § 2 was designated as § 6-54-141 by authority of the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act authorizing local governments to display historic documents, please refer to Acts 2012, ch. 686.

6-54-141. Fees to be adjudged as part of costs — Disbursement of fees.

As provided in § 38-6-103, the following fees shall be adjudged as a part of the costs in each case upon conviction of the following offenses:

Controlled substances, narcotics, drugs $ 20.00

Driving a motor vehicle, or operating a boat while under the influence of intoxicants and/or drugs, except as provided in § 55-10-413(d) 17.50

Certification of criminal histories and records Amount fixed by the federal bureau of investigation

Upon the forfeiture of a cash bond or other surety entered as a result of a municipal traffic citation, whether considered a fine, a bond or a tax 13.75

Such fees shall be in addition to and not in substitution for any and all fines and penalties otherwise provided for by law.

Except when and as provided in this section, the appropriate clerk, after deducting five percent (5%) as compensation when applicable, shall identify those fees set out in subsection (a) that are dedicated for use by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and remit the fees to the state treasury to be expended by the Tennessee bureau of investigation as appropriated by the general assembly. These fees shall be transmitted by the clerk of the court to the state treasurer for deposit in a fund to be used by the Tennessee bureau of investigation for the purpose of employing personnel; for the purchase of equipment and supplies; to pay for the education, training and scientific development of employees; or for any other purpose to allow the bureau’s business to be done in a more efficient and expeditious manner. The moneys received in the fund shall be invested for the benefit of the fund by the state treasurer pursuant to § 9-4-603. Amounts in the fund shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but shall, together with interest income credited to the fund, remain available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years.

Upon approval of the director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, local governing bodies which have the responsibility for providing funding for sheriffs' offices and police departments are authorized to purchase from state contracts approved for bureau purchases, scientific instruments designed to examine a person's breath and measure the alcohol content of a person's breath, for use as evidence in the trial of cases; provided, that prior to use of the scientific instruments, such instruments must be delivered to the forensic services division for testing and certification pursuant to § 38-6-103(g). The bureau shall continue to maintain and certify the instruments and operating personnel, pursuant to § 38-6-103(g), and furnish expert testimony in support of the use of the scientific instruments when required.

Acts 2012, ch. 1088, § 2; 2013, ch. 154, § 27.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1088, § 2 purported to enact a new section § 6-54-140. Section 6-54-140 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 686, § 2; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1088, § 2 was designated as § 6-54-141 by authority of the code commission.

6-54-142. Contracts and agreements of economic and community development program as public record.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, any contract or agreement, together with all supporting records and documentation, that obligates public funds as part of a municipality's economic and community development program to assist new and existing businesses and industries in locating or expanding in the municipality is a public record subject to title 10, chapter 7, part 5, and open for public inspection as of the date such contract or agreement is made available to members of the governing body. A governing body shall publicly disclose the proposed contract or agreement in a manner that would adequately notify and fairly inform the public of the proposed contract or agreement before voting on the proposal.

This section does not apply to trade secrets received or maintained by a municipality. All such trade secrets are confidential.

This section does not apply to company documents or records containing marketing information or capital plans that are provided to a municipality with the understanding that they are confidential. Any such document or record is confidential until such time as the provider thereof no longer requires its confidentiality.

As used in this section:

“Capital plans” means plans, feasibility studies, and similar research and information that will contribute to the identification of future business sites and capital investments;

“Marketing information” means marketing studies, marketing analyses, and similar research and information designed to identify potential customers and business relationships; and

“Trade secrets” means manufacturing processes, materials used in manufacturing processes, and costs associated with the manufacturing process of a person or company submitting information to a municipality relating to an opportunity to contract with the municipality.

Acts 2017, ch. 421, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 421, § 3. May 18, 2017.

6-54-143. Attendance of meetings by service members through use of two-way electronic audio-video communication.

By passage of an ordinance, by a two-thirds (2/3) vote, a municipal legislative body may allow a service member who is deployed for thirteen (13) months or less while serving as a member of the municipal legislative body to attend sessions of the body through the use of two-way electronic audio-video communication during the deployment. Attendance by the use of two-way electronic audio-video communication does not prevent the service member from being allowed to vote or drawing pay for attendance. Only one (1) service member at a time may attend and vote in sessions of the body as provided in this subsection (a).

As used in this section, “service member” means a member of the following:

The active and reserve components of the army, navy, air force, marine corps, or coast guard of the United States;

The United States merchant marine;

The commissioned corps of the United States public health service;

The commissioned corps of the national oceanic and atmospheric administration of the United States; or

The national guard of this state.

Acts 2018, ch. 604, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 604, § 2. March 23, 2018.

6-54-144. Ordinance prohibiting or restricting display of flag prohibited — Ordinance regulating manner or placement of flag.

As used in this section, “municipality” means any incorporated town, city, or metropolitan government.

Except as provided in subsection (c), a municipality shall not adopt or enforce an ordinance that prohibits or restricts, or has the effect of prohibiting or restricting, a property owner from displaying a flag of the United States of America, a flag of the state of Tennessee, the MIA/POW flag, or an official or replica flag of any branch of the United States armed forces on the property owner's property.

A municipality may adopt and enforce an ordinance that reasonably regulates the manner and placement of the display of a flag of the United States of America, a flag of the state of Tennessee, the MIA/POW flag, or an official or replica flag of any branch of the United States armed forces only when necessary to promote public health and safety.

Acts 2018, ch. 857, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning local government restrictions on flag displays, please see Acts 2018, ch. 857.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 857, § 2. May 3, 2018.

6-54-145. Stopping Addiction and Fostering Excellence (SAFE) Act.

As used in this section:

“Municipality” means an incorporated city or town, or a county with a metropolitan form of government; and

“Sober living home” means any home classified as a “single family residence” under § 13-24-102 that provides alcohol-free or drug-free housing, promotes independent living, life skill development, and reintegration, and provides structured activities that are directed primarily toward a group of unrelated individuals who are recovering from drug or alcohol addiction and who may be receiving outpatient healthcare services for substance abuse or addiction treatment while living in the home;

“Sober living home” does not mean:

A home that is chartered by a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization that:

Serves as an umbrella organization and organizes homes into chapters; and

Is governed by a council and board of directors that maintain the sole right to charter, and revoke the charter of, a home;

A home that is an affiliate of a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization located in this state that:

Pre-screens new affiliates;

Requires affiliates to adhere to a code of ethics; and

Requires affiliates to make an annual contribution based on the number of recovery residences; or

A home or facility that is licensed or funded by the department of mental health and substance abuse services.

A municipality may adopt an ordinance requiring each sober living home to display in a prominent place within the sober living home, a sign at least eleven inches (11") in height and seventeen inches (17") in width stating:

NOTICE: THIS IS A SOBER LIVING HOME THAT PROVIDES HOUSING TO MEN AND/OR WOMEN WHO DO NOT REQUIRE MORE STRUCTURED TREATMENT ENVIRONMENTS. THIS HOME PROMOTES INDEPENDENT LIVING, LIFE SKILL DEVELOPMENT, AND REINTEGRATION. THIS HOME IS DESIGNED TO ASSIST MEN AND/OR WOMEN TO RECOVER FROM DRUG OR ALCOHOL ADDICTION. THIS HOME IS NOT LICENSED OR FUNDED BY THE TENNESSEE DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE SERVICES AS IT IS PRIVATELY FUNDED AND DOES NOT PROVIDE TREATMENT SERVICES.

IF YOU ARE IN NEED OF TREATMENT SERVICES, PLEASE CALL THE TENNESSEE REDLINE AT 1-800-889-9789.

IF YOU WOULD LIKE ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REGARDING ADDITIONAL SUBSTANCE ABUSE SERVICES AND RESOURCES, INCLUDING SOBER LIVING OPTIONS, PLEASE VISIT THE TENNESSEE DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE SERVICES WEBSITE AT https://www.tn.gov/behavioral-health.html. THIS IS A NOTICE POSTED PURSUANT TO [MUNICIPALITY CODE REFERENCE].

A municipality shall display in the city hall or other building which houses the municipality's seat of local government, a sign at least eleven inches (11") in height and seventeen inches (17") in width stating:

PURSUANT TO TENNESSEE CODE ANNOTATED § 33-2-405, IT IS UNLAWFUL FOR A PERSON, PARTNERSHIP, ASSOCIATION, OR CORPORATION TO OWN OR OPERATE A SERVICE OR FACILITY THAT PROVIDES ALCOHOL AND DRUG ABUSE PREVENTION AND/OR TREATMENT WITHIN THE MEANING OF TITLE 33 OF THE TENNESSEE CODE ANNOTATED WITHOUT HAVING OBTAINED A LICENSE. A VIOLATION OF THIS REQUIREMENT IS A CLASS B MISDEMEANOR. EACH DAY OF OPERATION WITHOUT A LICENSE CONSTITUTES A SEPARATE OFFENSE. REPORT ANY SUSPECTED UNLICENSED ALCOHOL AND DRUG ABUSE PREVENTION AND/OR TREATMENT SERVICES TO THE TENNESSEE DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE SERVICES' OFFICE OF LICENSURE BY DIALING [WEST TENNESSEE LICENSURE OFFICE PHONE NUMBER; MIDDLE TENNESSEE LICENSURE OFFICE PHONE NUMBER; OR EAST TENNESSEE LICENSURE OFFICE PHONE NUMBER, AS APPLICABLE TO THE LOCATION OF THE MUNICIPALITY].

If a municipality maintains a website, the notice required under subsection (c) must be placed prominently on the municipality's website.

A municipality may adopt an ordinance encouraging sober living homes to:

Become chartered by an organization described under (a)(2)(B)(i); or

Comply with the requirements for recovery residences prescribed by an organization described under subdivision (a)(2)(B)(ii).

Any ordinance adopted under this section must comply with the Fair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C. § 3601 et seq., and the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.

Acts 2018, ch. 879, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 879, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Stopping Addiction and Fostering Excellence (SAFE) Act.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 879, § 3. July 1, 2018.

6-54-146. Prohibited regulation of business of person under 18 years of age.

As used in this section:

“Business” means any enterprise carried on for the purpose of gain or economic profit; and

“Gross receipts”:

Means all receipts from whatever sources derived before any deductions; and

Does not include tips, gratuities, or other amounts customarily assumed to be intended for the person who has served the customer or client.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a municipality shall not require a license, permit, or any other form of regulation for a business that:

Is operated solely by a person or persons under eighteen (18) years of age;

Is located on private property with the permission of the property owner; and

Generates gross receipts of three thousand dollars ($3,000) or less in a calendar year.

Acts 2019, ch. 210, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 210, § 3. July 1, 2019.